Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.290

Administrative hearing provided for in RCW 32.04.250 or 32.16.093—Procedure—Order—Judicial review.

(1) Any administrative hearing provided in RCW 32.04.250 or 32.16.093 must be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and held at the place designated by the director, and may be conducted by the department. The hearing shall be private unless the director determines that a public hearing is necessary to protect the public interest after fully considering the views of the party afforded the hearing.

(2) Within sixty days after the hearing, the director shall render a decision which shall include findings of fact upon which the decision is based and shall issue and serve upon each party to the proceeding an order or orders consistent with RCW 32.04.250 or 32.16.093, as the case may be.

(3) Unless a petition for review is timely filed in the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the affected mutual savings bank under subsection (5) of this section, and until the record in the proceeding has been filed as provided therein, the director may at any time modify, terminate, or set aside any order upon such notice and in such manner as he or she shall deem proper. Upon filing the record, the director may modify, terminate, or set aside any order only with permission of the court.

(4) The judicial review provided in this section shall be exclusive for orders issued under RCW 32.04.250 and 32.16.093.

(5) Any party to the proceeding or any person required by an order, temporary order, or injunction issued under RCW 32.04.250, 32.04.260, 32.04.280, or 32.16.093 to refrain from any of the violations or practices stated therein may obtain a review of any order served under subsection (1) of this section other than one issued upon consent by filing in the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the affected mutual savings bank within ten days after the date of service of the order a written petition praying that the order of the director be modified, terminated, or set aside. A copy of the petition shall be immediately served upon the director and the director shall then file in the court the record of the proceeding. The court shall have jurisdiction upon the filing of the petition, which jurisdiction shall become exclusive upon the filing of the record, to affirm, modify, terminate, or set aside in whole or in part the order of the director except that the director may modify, terminate, or set aside an order with the permission of the court. The judgment and decree of the court shall be final, except that it shall be subject to appellate review under the rules of court.

(6) The commencement of proceedings for judicial review under subsection (5) of this section shall not operate as a stay of any order issued by the director unless specifically ordered by the court.

(7) Service of any notice or order required to be served under RCW 32.04.250, 32.04.260, or 32.16.093, or under RCW 32.16.090, as now or hereafter amended, shall be accomplished in the same manner as required for the service of process in civil actions in superior courts of this state.

[ 2010 c 88 s 48; 1994 c 92 s 305; 1979 c 46 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1979 c 46: See note following RCW 32.04.250.